Missouri, session 2026, SB1770.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.2100, to read as
follows:
1.2100. 1. It is the intent of the general assembly
to:
(1) Refer to the land controlled by Israel from Jordan
during the 1967 Six-Day War by its historical name of "Judea
and Samaria", with the land south of Jerusalem being
considered "Judea" and the land north of Jerusalem being
considered "Samaria"; and
(2) No longer use the term "West Bank" in official
government materials.
2. (1) Except as provided under subsection 3 of this
section, a state agency shall not use the term "West Bank"
to refer to Judea and Samaria in any official government
material.
(2) A state agency shall not use state moneys to
create any official government material that refers to Judea
and Samaria as "West Bank".

SB 1770 2
3. The director of a state agency may waive the
prohibition under subsection 2 of this section if the
director:
(1) Determines that it is in the interests of the
state to do so; and
(2) Submits a written explanation of the waiver no
later than thirty days after the date on which the director
of the state agency makes a determination under subdivision
(1) of this subsection to both the president pro tempore of
the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.
4. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Official government material", a guidance, rule,
material, briefing, press release, or communication prepared
by a state agency; and
(2) "State agency", every department, division,
office, board, commission, and institution of this state.
✓